District of Columbia statutes.
16-2841

Inadmissibility of benevolent gestures.

For the purpose of any civil action or administrative proceeding alleging medical malpractice against a healthcare provider, an expression of sympathy or regret made in writing, orally, or by conduct made by or on behalf of the healthcare provider to a victim of the alleged medical malpractice, any member of the victim’s family, or any individual who claims damages by or through that victim, is inadmissible as an admission of liability. Nothing herein shall preclude the court from permitting the introduction of an admission of liability into evidence.

History

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-263, § 302, 54 DCR 807

Cross References

Distribution of undivided interests in any property of the estate, partition proceedings, see § 20-1105.